California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 fuel tank of the qualified motor vehicle and diesel fuel purchased in this state with the diesel fuel tax paid and delivered into the fuel tank of the qualified motor vehicle. Any diesel fuel tax paid to a diesel vendor for diesel fuel taken out of the state in the fuel tank of a qualified motor vehicle operated under a California fuel trip permit shall not be refunded to the holder of the California fuel trip permit, notwithstanding any other provision of this part.

The board may enter into an interagency agreement with the Department of Motor Vehicles providing for the issuance of California fuel trip permits by that department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administrative Provisions [60128. - 60128.]

60128.

All of the administrative provisions of this part not inconsistent with this chapter shall be applicable to the administration of the tax imposed by Section 60115.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. International Fuel Tax Agreement [60130. - 60130.]

60130.

Effective on and after January 1, 1996, the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9405) of Part 3.5 shall apply to all interstate users.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Licenses [60131. - 60190.]



  ARTICLE 1. Licenses for Suppliers [60131. - 60135.]

60131.

Every person, before becoming a supplier, shall apply to the board for a license authorizing the person to engage in business as a supplier. A supplier’s license shall be issued only to a person who is a supplier of diesel fuel within the meaning of the word “supplier” as defined in Section 60033. It is unlawful for any person to be a supplier without first securing a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60132.

Applications shall be made on forms prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60133.

Before granting a license authorizing a person to engage in business as a supplier, the board may require the person to file with the board security pursuant to Section 60401. The license issued to any supplier is not transferable and is valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60135.

Every person before becoming a pipeline operator or a vessel operator shall apply to the board for a license on forms prescribed by the board. In addition, every train operator that transports diesel fuel into, out of, or within this state shall obtain a license from the board on forms prescribed by the board. A train operator license, pipeline operator license, or a vessel operator license shall be issued only to a person who is a train operator, pipeline operator, or a vessel operator as defined in Sections 60041, 60047.1, and 60049.1. It is unlawful for a
 person to act as a pipeline operator or a vessel operator without first securing a license. It is unlawful for a train operator to transport diesel fuel into, out of, or within this state on or after January 1, 2009, without first securing a license under this section or a permit under Section 60106.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 306, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. License for Exempt Bus Operator [60141. - 60143.]

60141.

Every person before becoming an exempt bus operator, shall apply for a license authorizing the person to engage in business as an exempt bus operator. A license shall be issued only to a person who is an exempt bus operator as defined in Section 60040. It is unlawful for any person to be an exempt bus operator without first securing a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60142.

Application shall be made on forms to be prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60143.

Before granting a license authorizing a person to engage in business as an exempt bus operator, the board may require the person to file with the board security pursuant to Section 60401. The license issued to any exempt bus operator is not transferable and is valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. License for Government Entity [60146. - 60146.]

60146.

Each government entity operating a diesel-powered highway vehicle upon this state’s highways shall apply for a diesel fuel tax license on forms prescribed by the board. It is unlawful for any government entity to operate a diesel-powered highway vehicle upon the state’s highways without first securing a diesel fuel tax license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 34, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 22 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. License for Ultimate Vendor [60151. - 60153.]

60151.

(a) A person shall be licensed if that person is engaged in the activity of an “ultimate vendor” of diesel fuel. It is unlawful for any person to act as an ultimate vendor without first securing a license.

(b) If a person is a supplier and an ultimate vendor, the supplier’s license may cover the ultimate vendor activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60152.

Applications shall be made on forms prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60153.

The board shall license an applicant as an ultimate vendor of diesel fuel only if the board determines that the applicant meets the necessary requirements and is satisfied with the filing, deposit, payment, and claim history for all state taxes of the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. License for Highway Vehicle Operator and End Seller [60161. - 60163.]

60161.

(a) Every person before becoming a qualified highway vehicle operator shall apply to the board for a license authorizing the person to engage in business as a qualified highway vehicle operator. A license shall be issued only to a person who is qualified to use dyed diesel fuel on the highway by the Internal Revenue Service under Section 48.4082-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) If the person is already licensed as an exempt
 bus operator, government entity, or interstate user, the person does not need a separate qualified highway vehicle operator’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 61.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60162.

Applications shall be made on forms prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60163.

Before granting a license authorizing a person to report the backup tax as a qualified highway vehicle operator, the board may require the person to file with the board security pursuant to Section 60401. The license issued to any qualified highway vehicle operator is not transferable and is valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 62.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Denial of License [60171. - 60173.]

60171.

The board may refuse to issue any license in either of the following circumstances:

(a) If the application therefor is filed by an applicant who formerly held any license under this part that, prior to the time of filing the application, has been revoked for cause by the board.

(b) If the board determines that the application therefor is not filed in good faith or made by the real person in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60172.

Prior to refusal specified in Section 60171, the board shall grant the applicant a hearing and shall give him or her at least 10 days’ written notice of the time and place thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60173.

The notice specified in Section 60172 shall be addressed to the applicant at his or her address as it appears in the records of the board, and shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 60311 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revocation of License [60180. - 60186.]

60180.

The board may revoke the license of any person who refuses or neglects to comply with any provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the board prescribed and adopted under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60181.

The board may revoke any of the following licenses:

(a) Any supplier’s license held by a person who does not engage in, or who discontinues, the removal, entry, or sale of diesel fuel, producing of blended diesel fuel, owning or holding inventory position of diesel fuel, or owning or operating a refinery or terminal as any of the following:

(1) A blender, as defined in Section 60012.

(2) An enterer, as defined in Section 60013.

(3) A positionholder, as defined in Section 60010.

(4) A refiner, as defined in Section 60011.

(5) A terminal operator, as defined in Section 60009.

(6) A throughputter, as defined in Section 60035.

(b) Any interstate user’s license held by a person who does not engage in, or who discontinues, using diesel fuel as an “interstate user” as defined in Section 60111.

(c) Any ultimate vendor’s license held by a person who does not engage in, or who discontinues, selling undyed diesel fuel as an “ultimate vendor” as defined in
 Section 60036.

(d) Any exempt bus operator’s license held by a person who does not engage in, or who discontinues, using diesel fuel as an “exempt bus operator” as defined in Section 60040.

(e) Any qualified highway vehicle operator’s license held by a person who does not engage in, or who discontinues, the delivery of diesel fuel subject to the backup tax into fuel tanks of diesel-powered highway vehicles as a qualified highway vehicle operator as defined in Section 60027.

(f) Any government entity’s license held by a government entity that does not engage in, or that discontinues using diesel fuel in, the operation of a diesel-powered highway vehicle upon the state’s highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 63.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60182.

Prior to revoking any license, the board shall notify the licensee to show cause, within 10 days after the notice is given, why his or her license should not be revoked. The notice shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 60311 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60183.

The board may cancel any license issued under this part immediately upon surrender thereof, but before revoking a license, the board shall allow the person an opportunity to show cause as provided in Section 60182.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60184.

Upon revocation or cancellation of the license of the person or his or her cessation of business, all diesel fuel remaining in his or her possession or ownership shall be deemed removed, entered, sold, delivered, or used and subject to jeopardy determination as provided in Section 60330 if, in the judgment of the board, it is necessary to ensure payment of the tax with respect to the removal, entry, sale, delivery, or use of the diesel fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60185.

Subsequent to the revocation of the license of a person, the board shall reinstate the permit when the person pays the amount of tax determined, together with interest and penalties, fully complies with this part, and pays a fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the board for reinstatement. The fee shall not be subject to refund except as provided in Section 60521.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60186.

It is unlawful for any person to operate in this state after a license has been revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Licensing of Locations [60190. - 60190.]

60190.

Every person required to be licensed by the board shall provide the board with the names and addresses of all agents operating in this state, the location of all offices or other places of business in this state, and any other information as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Determinations and Payments [60201. - 60366.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns and Payments [60201. - 60212.]

60201.

Each supplier shall prepare and file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the total number of gallons of diesel fuel removed, entered, or sold by him or her within this state during each calendar month, or the monthly period ended during that calendar month as the board may authorize, the amount of tax due for the month covered by the return, and any other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The person shall file the
 return on or before the last day of the calendar month following the monthly period to which it relates, together with a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due for that period, less whatever amounts may have been paid theretofore for the same period because of weekly returns. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the returns for other than monthly periods. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60201.1.

Each person subject to the tax imposed under Section 60050.1, on or before September 30, 1995, shall prepare and file with the board, on forms prescribed by the board, a return showing the total number of gallons of undyed diesel fuel owned by the person on July 1, 1995, for which a tax has not been imposed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) as in effect on June 30, 1995, the amount of the tax imposed, and any other information that the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part.

The
 return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the board in the amount of tax due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60201.2.

A supplier who sells taxable diesel fuel shall collect from the purchaser the diesel fuel tax imposed under Section 60050. At the election of the purchaser, the payment of the diesel fuel tax owed on every gallon of diesel fuel purchased from a supplier shall be remitted to the supplier on terms agreed upon between the purchaser and the supplier or on or before five working days before the last day of the calendar month following the monthly period to which it relates. This election shall be subject to a condition that the purchaser’s remittances of all
 amounts of tax due to the seller shall be paid by electronic funds transfer. The purchaser’s election may be terminated by the seller if the purchaser does not make timely payments to the seller as required by this section. This section shall not apply where the purchaser is required by a supplier to pay cash or cash equivalent for diesel fuel purchases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 11.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60201.3.

(a) A supplier is relieved from liability for diesel fuel tax insofar as the sales of the diesel fuel are represented by accounts which have been found worthless and charged off for income tax purposes. If the supplier has previously paid the amount of the tax, he or she may, under the rules and regulations prescribed by the board, take a credit in that amount. If those accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the supplier, the gallons of diesel fuel represented by the amounts collected shall be included in the first
 return filed after that collection and the amount of the tax thereon shall be paid with the return. The board may, at its option, require the supplier to submit periodic reports listing accounts delinquent for a 90-day period or more.

(b) Any customer of a supplier who has failed to pay for diesel fuel purchased and for which the supplier has been allowed a credit under subdivision (a) is liable to the state for the diesel fuel tax as an unlicensed supplier and the tax, applicable penalties, and interest become immediately due and payable under the unlicensed persons provisions contained in Article 6 (commencing with Section 60360) of Chapter 6. The notice of determination issued under Section 60361 shall be given to the customer within three years of the last day of the calendar month following the reporting period for which the supplier took a credit for the tax previously paid on the customer’s account or within three years after the date a
 refund of the tax was paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

60201.4.

On or before January 1, 2018, each person subject to the storage tax imposed under Section 60050.2 shall prepare and file with the board, in a form prescribed by the board, a return showing the total number of gallons of tax-paid diesel fuel owned by the person on November 1, 2017, the amount of the storage tax, and any other information that the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the board in
 the amount of tax due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 34.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

60202.

(a) Each interstate user shall prepare and file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the amount of diesel fuel used during the quarterly reporting period by the interstate user in this state, the amount of any tax due, and any other information as the board may require for the administration of this part. The return shall be filed with the board on or before the last day of the calendar month following the close of the quarterly period to which
 it relates, together with a remittance payable to the board of the amount of tax due. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of returns for other than quarterly periods. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) An interstate user subject to the tax imposed by Section 60115 shall be allowed a credit against the amount of tax due on his or her return for an amount equal to the tax imposed by Section 60115 on diesel fuel purchased in this state in that same return period for use in the operation of a qualified motor vehicle. No credit shall be allowed unless the tax imposed by Section 60050 and the taxes imposed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution have been paid upon the purchase of the
 diesel fuel by the interstate user to a diesel vendor in this state. When the amount of the credit for any return period exceeds the amount of tax due for the return period, the excess shall be allowed as a credit against the amount of tax due for succeeding reporting periods or shall be refunded.

(c) Credits and refunds allowed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be charged against the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account to the extent the total amount of credits and refunds allowed to all taxpayers for the fiscal year does not exceed the combined amounts due under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 60115. To the extent the total amount of credits and refunds allowed to all taxpayers for the fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) exceeds the combined amounts due under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 60115, the credits and refunds shall be charged against the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account as to the amount of the credits and refunds established under
 subdivision (a) of Section 60115 and shall be charged against the Retail Sales Tax Fund as to the amount of the credits and refunds established under subdivision (b) of Section 60115.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60204.

(a) Each terminal operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing, for the calendar month, or that monthly period ended during the calendar month as the board may authorize, the following:

(1) The name and license number of each person that is a positionholder at each terminal it operates.

(2) The amount of diesel fuel received at each terminal it operates.

(3) The identity of each positionholder with respect to the rack removals of diesel fuel from each terminal it operates and the volume and dates of the removals.

(4) The amount of diesel fuel stored at each terminal it operates.

(5) The destination (by state) of all diesel fuel removed at a terminal rack of each terminal it operates, to the extent that information has been provided to the terminal operator.

(6) Any other information required by the board for the proper administration of this part.

The terminal operator shall file the report on or before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates. To
 facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the reports for other than monthly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) Upon written approval of the board, a terminal operator may satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) above by executing and providing to the board a consent and authorization for the Internal Revenue Service to provide to the board under Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, the return filed by the terminal operator under Section 48.4101-2 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The board may, in its sole discretion, rescind its approval and require a terminal operator to file reports as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60204.5.

(a) Each pipeline operator and vessel operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing, for the calendar month, or that monthly period ended during the calendar month as the board may authorize, all of the following:

(1) The amount of diesel fuel delivered to each terminal or refinery.

(2) The location of the terminal or refinery where the diesel fuel was delivered.

(3) The date of delivery.

(4) Any other information required by the board for the proper administration of this part. The pipeline operator and vessel operator shall file the report on or before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the reports for other than monthly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) Upon written approval of the board, a pipeline operator and vessel operator may satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) by executing and providing to the board a consent and
 authorization for the Internal Revenue Service to provide to the board under Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, the return filed by the pipeline operator and vessel operator under Section 48.4101-2 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The board may, in its sole discretion, rescind its approval and require a pipeline operator and vessel operator to file reports as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 65.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60204.6.

Each train operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing, for the calendar month, or that monthly period ended during the calendar month as the board may authorize, all of the following:

(a) The amount of diesel fuel delivered into, out of, or within this state.

(b) The location where the diesel fuel was
 delivered.

(c) The date of delivery.

(d) Any other information required by the board for the proper administration of this part. The train operator shall file the report on or before the last day of the month following the monthly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the reports for other than monthly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 306, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

60205.

Each exempt bus operator shall prepare and file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the total number of gallons of diesel fuel used in the exempt bus operation by him or her within this state during each calendar month, or the monthly period ended during that calendar month as the board may authorize, the amount of tax pursuant to Section 60502.2 due for the month covered by the return, and any other information as the board deems necessary for the proper
 administration of this part. The person shall file the return on or before the last day of the calendar month following the monthly period to which it relates, together with a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due for that period. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the returns for other than monthly periods. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60205.5.

(a) Each government entity shall prepare and file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the total number of gallons of dyed diesel fuel and undyed diesel fuel used in a diesel-powered highway vehicle during each calendar month, or the monthly period ending during the calendar month covered by the return, and any other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The person shall file the return on or
 before the last day of the calendar month following the monthly period to which it relates, together with a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due for that period. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the returns for other than monthly periods. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) A government entity that has paid diesel fuel tax to a retail vendor that sold the diesel fuel to the government entity shall be allowed a credit on its tax return for the tax paid to the retail vendor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60206.

Each qualified highway vehicle operator shall prepare and file with the board a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the total number of gallons of diesel fuel subject to the backup tax that was delivered into the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle within this state during each calendar month, or the monthly period ended during that calendar month as the board may authorize, the amount of tax due for the month covered by the return, and any
 other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The person shall file the return on or before the last day of the calendar month following the monthly period to which it relates, together with a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due for that period. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of the returns for other than monthly periods. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 66.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60207.

(a) Any person who fails to pay the amount of tax shown to be due by that person’s return on or before the last day of the month following the reporting period to which it relates, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax, together with interest on that tax at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who
 fails to file a return in accordance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 60201) shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60207.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the tax was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of tax was made one business day after the date the tax was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of tax.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5, determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section does not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where a return has not been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section only applies to electronic payments of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 172.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

60208.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board for good cause may extend for a period not to exceed one month, the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension to the date of
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 14.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

60208.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 110.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60209.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report, return, or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 60207, 60250, 60301, 60338, and 60355.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the
 department may grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 111.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60210.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the
 following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction that occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice
 to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, that renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.
